Hawaii statutes.
[§606-13.6] Private court reporters;
contracts. (a) Any contract for private court reporting services, not
related to a particular case or reporting incident, shall be prohibited between
a private court reporter or any other person with whom a private court reporter
has a principal and agency relationship, and any attorney, party to an action,
party having a financial interest in an action, or any entity providing the
services of a certified shorthand reporter. Negotiating or bidding reasonable
fees, equal to all parties, on a case-by-case basis may not be prohibited.

(b) Violation of this section shall be grounds
for discipline, censure, or suspension or revocation of licensure. [L
1996, c 226, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Certification of court reporters, see Rules Governing
Court Reporting.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next